North Dakota statutes. TITLE 31 Judicial Proof
CHAPTER 31-07 Perpetuation of Testimony [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure]

31-07-01.
When testimony may be taken and perpetuated. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(a)(1).

31-07-02.
Application for order for perpetuation of testimony — Where made — Form — Verification — Contents. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(a)(1).

31-07-03.
Order for perpetuation of testimony — When made — Contents. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(a)(3).

31-07-04.
Manner of service of notice of taking and perpetuating of testimony. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(a)(2).

31-07-05.
Issuance of commission and settlement of interrogatories for perpetuation of testimony taken outside of state. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(a)(3), 28(a), (b), 31(a).

31-07-06.
Officer authorized to take testimony — Filing of papers with such officer before taking testimony required. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 28(a).

31-07-07.
Depositions taken, authenticated, and returned, how — Taking adjournable from day to day. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(f).

31-07-08.
Filing of papers required — Papers filed constitute prima facie proof of compliance with chapter provisions. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(f).

31-07-09.
When, where, and by whom perpetuated testimony may be read in evidence. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(a)(4).

31-07-10.
Objections available when perpetuated testimony is introduced at trial. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(e), 30(c), now Rules 32(b), 30(c).

31-07-11.
Costs paid by whom. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(c).

31-07-12.
Perpetuation of testimony of injured persons — Permitted — Notice — Service of notice. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(a)(1), (2).

31-07-13.
Regulations for the taking of the deposition of injured person. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27.

31-07-14.
Sealing, returning, and opening of deposition of injured person. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(f).

31-07-15.
Authentication and use of deposition of injured person. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 27(a)(4), 30(f).